Tennessee, session 114, HB2063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106, is amended by designating
subsection (a) as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following new subdivision (a)(2):
(2) The speakers of the senate and house of representatives shall determine the
number of conferences, or the number of conference days, for which a member of the
senate or house of representatives is entitled to attend for purposes of receiving
expense and mileage allowances under this section. The number of approved
conferences, or number of approved conference days, must be the same for members of
the senate and the house of representatives. As used in this subdivision (a)(2),
"conference" means a conference, symposium, workshop, assemblage, gathering, or
other official meeting concerning state business and the duties of a member of the
general assembly, held within or without this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect November 3, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2063
012032
- 1 -